Maryland, session 2025, HB0346.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
12–102.
This title applies only in Baltimore City.
12–1603.
(a) The alcoholic beverages districts described in this section at all times are
coterminous with the legislative districts in the Legislative Districting Plan of 2022.
– 1 –

Ch. 805 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(b) Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, the Board may not issue a
new license in:
(3) the 43rd alcoholic beverages district;
(c) The Board may issue:
(17) a Class A–7 beer, wine, and liquor license in the 1200 block of West
North Avenue in the 40th alcoholic beverages district, if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Penn North Community Association;
(ii) alcoholic beverages are sold only as part of a gift basket or floral
arrangement; and
(iii) the applicant does not hold or apply for a Class BWLT beer, wine,
and liquor (on–premises) tasting license; [and]
(18) a Class B beer, wine, and liquor license for a restaurant on the even
side of the 400 block of West 29th Street in the 40th alcoholic beverages district if:
(i) the applicant executes a memorandum of understanding with the
Greater Remington Improvement Association; and
(ii) the Board waives a minimum seating requirement under item
(1)(ii)2 of this subsection;
(19) A CLASS B–D–7 LICENSE IN THE 2600 BLOCK OF HUNTINGDON
AVENUE IN THE 43RD ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF ITEMS
OTHER THAN PACKAGE GOODS ARE AT LEAST 51% OF THE APPLICANT’S TOTAL
DAILY RECEIPTS;
(II) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE GREATER REMINGTON IMPROVEMENT ASSOCIATION;
AND
(III) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CREATE A SEPARATE PACKAGE
GOODS DEPARTMENT;
(20) THREE CLASS B–D–7 LICENSES IN THE 2700 BLOCK OF
HUNTINGDON AVENUE IN THE 43RD ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 805
(I) AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF ITEMS
OTHER THAN PACKAGE GOODS ARE AT LEAST 51% OF THE APPLICANT’S TOTAL
DAILY RECEIPTS;
(II) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE GREATER REMINGTON IMPROVEMENT ASSOCIATION;
AND
(III) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CREATE A SEPARATE PACKAGE
GOODS DEPARTMENT; AND
(21) A CLASS B–D–7 LICENSE IN THE 300 BLOCK OF WEST 29TH
STREET IN THE 43RD ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES DISTRICT IF:
(I) AVERAGE DAILY RECEIPTS FROM THE SALE OF ITEMS
OTHER THAN PACKAGE GOODS ARE AT LEAST 51% OF THE APPLICANT’S TOTAL
DAILY RECEIPTS;
(II) THE APPLICANT EXECUTES A MEMORANDUM OF
UNDERSTANDING WITH THE GREATER REMINGTON IMPROVEMENT ASSOCIATION;
AND
(III) THE APPLICANT DOES NOT CREATE A SEPARATE PACKAGE
GOODS DEPARTMENT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, notwithstanding § 12–2202
of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, a Class C license issued for a premises in
the 4500 block of North Charles Street shall be considered unexpired until the end of July
1, 2026, for the purpose of being renewed to the current license year by the licensee.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 3 –